Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 23. Adoption.
Sec. 25.23.180.
Relinquishment and termination of parent and child relationships.

The rights of a parent with reference to a child, including parental right to control the child or to withhold consent to an adoption, may be relinquished and the relationship of parent and child terminated in or before an adoption proceeding as provided in this section.

All rights of a parent with reference to a child, including the right to receive notice of a hearing on a petition for adoption, may be relinquished and the relationship of parent and child terminated by a writing, signed by the parent, regardless of the age of the parent, a copy of which shall be given to the parent,

in the presence of a representative of an agency taking custody of the child, whether the agency is within or outside of the state or in the presence and with the approval of a court within or outside of this state in which the minor was present or in which the parent resided at the time it was signed, which relinquishment may be withdrawn within 10 days after it is signed or the child is born, whichever is later; and the relinquishment is invalid unless it states that the parent has this right of withdrawal; or

in any other situation if the petitioner has had custody of the minor for two years, but only if notice of the adoption proceeding has been given to the parent and the court finds, after considering the circumstances of the relinquishment and the long continued custody by the petitioner, that the best interest of the child requires the granting of adoption.

The relationship of parent and child may be terminated by a court order issued in connection with a proceeding

under this chapter or a proceeding under AS 47.10 on the grounds

specified in AS

47.10.080(o)

or

47.10.088

; or

that a parent who does not have custody is unreasonably withholding consent to adoption, contrary to the best interest of the minor child;

under this chapter, a proceeding under AS 47.10, or an independent proceeding on the grounds that the parent committed an act constituting sexual assault, sexual abuse of a minor, or incest under the laws of this state, or a comparable offense under the laws of the state where the act occurred, that resulted in conception of the child and that termination of the parental rights of the biological parent is in the best interests of the child.

For the purpose of an adoption proceeding under this chapter, a decree issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in this or another state terminating all rights of a parent with reference to a child or the relationship of parent and child dispenses with the required

consent by that parent to an adoption of that child; and

notice of a proceeding to that parent unless otherwise required by this section.

A petition for termination of the relationship of parent and child made in connection with an adoption proceeding or in an independent proceeding for the termination of parental rights on grounds set out in (c)(2) of this section may be made by

either parent if termination of the relationship is sought with respect to the other parent;

the petitioner for adoption, the guardian of the person, the legal custodian of the child, or the individual standing in parental relationship to the child;

an agency; or

another person having a legitimate interest in the matter.

Before the petition is heard, notice of the hearing on the petition and opportunity to be heard shall be given the parents of the child, the guardian of the person of the child, the person having legal custody of the child, and, in the discretion of the court, a person appointed to represent any party.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (b) of this section, a relinquishment of parental rights with respect to a child, executed under this section, may be withdrawn by the parent, and a decree of a court terminating the parent and child relationship on grounds set out in (c)(1) of this section may be vacated by the court upon motion of the parent, if the child is not on placement for adoption and the person having custody of the child consents in writing to the withdrawal or vacation of the decree.

The respondent to a petition filed for the termination of parental rights on grounds set out in (c)(2) of this section is entitled to representation in the proceedings by an attorney. If the respondent is financially unable to employ an attorney, the court shall appoint the office of public advocacy to represent the respondent in the proceedings.

Proceedings for the termination of parental rights on the grounds set out in (c)(2) of this section do not affect the rights of a victim of sexual assault, sexual abuse of a minor, or incest to obtain legal and equitable civil remedies for all injuries and damages arising out of the perpetrator’s conduct.

In a relinquishment of parental rights executed under (a) of this section, a parent may retain privileges with respect to the child, including the ability to have future contact, communication, and visitation with the child. A retained privilege must be stated in writing with specificity. Not less than 10 days after the relinquishment is signed, the court may enter an order terminating parental rights if the court finds that termination of parental rights under the terms of the agreement is in the child’s best interest. If a parent has retained one or more privileges, the court shall incorporate the retained privileges into the termination order with a recommendation that the retained privileges be incorporated in an adoption or legal guardianship decree.

A voluntary relinquishment may not be withdrawn and a termination order may not be vacated on the ground that a retained privilege has been withheld from the relinquishing parent or that the relinquishing parent has been unable, for any reason, to act on a retained privilege, except as provided in Rule 60(b), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

After a termination order is entered, a person who has voluntarily relinquished parental rights under this section may request a review hearing, upon a showing of good cause, to seek enforcement or modification of or to vacate a privilege retained in the termination order. The court may modify, enforce, or vacate the retained privilege if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that it is in the best interest of the child to do so.

After a termination order is entered and before the entry of an adoption or legal guardianship decree, a prospective adoptive parent or a guardian of a child who is the subject of an adoption decree may request, after providing notice as specified under this subsection, that the court decline to incorporate a privilege retained in a termination order and recommended for incorporation in an adoption or guardianship decree under (j) of this section. The request made under this subsection may only be considered by the court after providing at least 20 days’ notice by certified mail to the last known address of the person who has voluntarily relinquished parental rights to the child. The notice under this subsection must describe the request and explain that the recipient of the notice may submit a written statement under penalty of perjury to the court that the recipient either agrees with or opposes the request. The notice must also include the deadline for submitting the statement and the mailing address of the court. The court may decline to incorporate a retained privilege if the person who retained the privilege agrees with the request or if the court finds that it is in the child’s best interest.

A person who relinquished parental rights is entitled to the appointment of an attorney if a hearing is requested under (l) or (m) of this section to the same extent as if the parent’s rights had not been terminated in a child-in-need-of-aid proceeding.

A petition for termination of parental rights under (c)(2) of this section may be filed to initiate an independent proceeding not connected to a petition for adoption or a proceeding under AS 47.10.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1974; am § 32 ch 21 SLA 1985; am §§ 10 — 13 ch 50 SLA 1987; am § 12 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 64 SLA 2005; am § 31 ch 43 SLA 2013; am §§ 12 – 17 ch 24 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 20.15.180. Renumbered in 1982.

Cross references. —

For the text of Rule 9(a), Alaska Adoption Rules, amending the content of the consent or relinquishment form to be used in a voluntary termination of parental rights to conform to the requirement of (j) of this section that a retained privilege be stated with specificity, see § 56, ch. 64, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

For the effect of the 2018 amendments to (c) and (o) of this section on Rules 1(b) and 6(c), Alaska Adoption Rules, see sec. 19(b), ch. 24, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For subsidized adoption and subsidized guardianship payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (i), inserted “sexual assault,” following “rights of a victim of”.

The 2018 amendment, effective September 13, 2018, in (c), substituted “under this chapter, a proceeding under AS 47.10, or an independent proceeding on the grounds” for “or (3)” at the beginning of (c)(2), inserted “, or incest” following “abuse of a minor”, and made stylistic and related changes; in the introductory language in (e), substituted “set out in (c)(2)” for “set out in (c)(3)” near the end; in (g), deleted “and (2)” following “set out in (c)(1)”; in (h) and (i), substituted “set out in (c)(2)” for “set out in (c)(3)”; added (o).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 60(b), ch. 64, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 enactment of (j) — (n) of this section has the effect of amending Rules 9 and 13, Alaska Adoption Rules, by requiring retained privileges to be set out in the relinquishment form and order and by providing additional procedures related to the relinquishment.
Section 60(c), ch. 64, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 enactment of (k) — (n) of this section has the effect of amending Rule 13, Alaska Adoption Rules, by authorizing review hearings for voluntary relinquishments.

Sec. 25.23.185.
Records and information.

At the time a petition for adoption is filed with the court, the agency or individual placing the person for adoption, or the petitioner, shall file with the court, for release to the state registrar of vital statistics, the following information, or an explanation of its unavailability, on forms provided by the department:

the address of each parent named on the original birth certificate; and

background information required under AS

18.50.510

.

Upon entry of a decree of adoption, the clerk of the court shall transmit to the Bureau of Vital Statistics the information provided under (a) of this section. The bureau shall attach the information to the original birth certificate of the adopted person.

A child adoption agency licensed under former AS 47.35 and a child placement agency licensed under AS 47.32 shall maintain records of the information required to be furnished to the court under this section or under regulations of the commissioner implementing this section. If a child adoption agency or child placement agency ceases to place persons for adoption, it shall transfer its records to the commissioner.

History.

(§ 18 ch 140 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 124 SLA 1994; am § 13 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Sec. 25.23.190.
Subsidy for hard-to-place child.

A hard-to-place child in the permanent custody of the department in a foster home for not less than one year may not be denied the opportunity for a permanent home if the achievement of this depends on continued subsidy by the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 36 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 20.15.190. Renumbered in 1982.

Administrative Code. —

For subsidized adoption and subsidized guardianship payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 2.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 36, SLA 1977 (SB 54), see 1977 Senate Journal, p. 56.

Sec. 25.23.200.
Investigation of home for subsidized hard-to-place child.

Persons who are caring for a hard-to-place child on a foster parent basis and who have applied to adopt the hard-to-place child and to receive payments for the care and support of the hard-to-place child shall be evaluated as to their suitability as adoptive parents by means of an adoptive home study. Persons who are caring for a hard-to-place child in the state’s custody and who wish to be appointed legal guardians of the child under
AS

13.26.132

, and to receive payments for the care and support of the child, shall be evaluated as to their suitability as guardians by means of a guardianship study. A home study or guardianship study shall be made by the commissioner’s adoption staff or on the commissioner’s behalf by an authorized agency or individual that provides adoption services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1974; am § 3 ch 36 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 204 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 20.15.200. Renumbered in 1982.

In 2016, "AS

13.26.132

" was substituted for "AS

13.26.045

" to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Administrative Code. —

For subsidized adoption and subsidized guardianship payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 2.

For children in custody or under supervision: needs and income, see 7 AAC 53, art. 3.

Sec. 25.23.210.
Amount and duration of subsidy payments.

The department may adopt regulations to set the amount and length of time that a subsidy for a hard-to-place child may be granted.

A subsidy granted by the department under this section may be

paid for a specified length of time not to extend after the child’s 18th birthday; and

a deferred subsidy; in this paragraph, “deferred subsidy” means that no monetary reimbursement is paid to a family but other benefits are paid for the child.

A subsidy granted under this section may not

exceed the existing rate for foster care; or

be changed without the written request or consent of the person caring for the child.

The department shall review whether the amount of a subsidy granted for a child is appropriate on request of the person caring for the child.

Subsidies shall be paid from the same public funds and in the same manner as foster care payments.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 36 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 38 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 20.15.210. Renumbered in 1982.

Administrative Code. —

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

For subsidized adoption and subsidized guardianship payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 2.

For children in custody or under supervision: needs and income, see 7 AAC 53, art. 3.

Sec. 25.23.220.
Annual reevaluation of subsidy. [Repealed, § 4 ch 31 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 25.23.230.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations necessary to implement the provisions of AS

25.23.185

—

25.23.240

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1974; am § 19 ch 140 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 20.15.230. Renumbered in 1982.

Administrative Code. —

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

For subsidized adoption and subsidized guardianship payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 2.

Sec. 25.23.240.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“adult” means an individual who has reached the age of majority;

“agency” means any person certified, licensed, or otherwise specially empowered by law or regulation to place minors for adoption;

“child” means a son or daughter, whether by birth or by adoption;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“court” means the superior court of this state, and, when the context requires, the court of another state empowered to grant petitions for adoption or guardianship or to terminate parental rights;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“hard-to-place child” means a minor who is not likely to be adopted or to obtain a guardian by reason of physical or mental disability, emotional disturbance, recognized high risk of physical or mental disease, age, membership in a sibling group, racial or ethnic factors, or any combination of these conditions;

“minor” means a person who has not reached the age of majority;

“sexual abuse of a minor” means a sexual offense defined in AS

11.41.434

,

11.41.436

,

11.41.438

, or

11.41.440

;

“sexual assault” means a sexual offense defined in AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.427

;

“stepparent” means the spouse of a natural parent of the child residing in the same household.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 36 SLA 1977; am § 20 ch 140 SLA 1986; am §§ 14, 15 ch 50 SLA 1987; am §§ 4, 5 ch 204 SLA 1990; am § 32 ch 43 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 20.15.240. Renumbered in 1982. Reorganized in 1987 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Cross references. —

For age of majority, see AS

25.20.010

—

25.20.020

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (10), substituted “AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.427

” for “AS

11.41.410

or

11.41.420

”.